Washington statutes.
RCW 18.380.080

Temporary license.

The secretary may grant a temporary license to a person who does not reside in this state if he or she: (1) Is licensed to practice applied behavior analysis in another state or province of Canada; or (2) meets other qualifications established by the secretary. A temporary license holder may only practice applied behavior analysis for a limited period of time, as defined by the secretary.

[ 2015 c 118 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 c 118: See note following RCW 18.380.010.